Missouri, session 2026, HB2261.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 577.070, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 577.070, to read as follows:
577.070. 1. A person commits the offense of littering if he or she places, deposits, or
causes to be placed or deposited, any glass, glass bottles, waste materials resulting from the
intentional outdoor release or abandonment of one or more balloons, wire, nails, tacks,
hedge, cans, garbage, trash, refuse, or rubbish of any kind, nature or description on the right-
of-way of any public road or state highway or on or in any of the waters in this state or on the
banks of any stream, or on any land or water owned, operated or leased by the state, any
board, department, agency or commission thereof or on any land or water owned, operated or
leased by the federal government or on any private real property owned by another without
the owner's consent.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, the offense of littering is a
class C misdemeanor unless:
(1) Such littering creates a substantial risk of physical injury or property damage to
another; or
(2) The person has been found guilty of a violation of this section or an offense
committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be a violation under
this section, in which case it is a class A misdemeanor.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2261 2
3. If the offense of littering involves the intentional outdoor release or
abandonment of one or more balloons, the following penalties shall apply:
(1) For a first offense if a person intentionally releases or abandons ten balloons
or fewer, the person shall be subject to a fine that is no less than one hundred dollars but
no more than five hundred dollars. Any second or subsequent offense shall result in a
fine no less than five hundred one dollars but no more than one thousand dollars;
(2) For a first offense if a person intentionally releases or abandons eleven or
more balloons, the person shall be subject to a fine that is no less than five hundred
dollars. Any second or subsequent offense shall result in a fine no less than two
thousand dollars.
4. It is a violation of this section for a person to intentionally release or abandon
outdoors a balloon that is inflated or filled with a gas that is lighter than air, except that
it is not a violation of this section for a person to:
(1) Unintentionally release balloons in any amount; or
(2) Intentionally release or abandon outdoors a balloon carrying scientific
instrumentation, a balloon used for meteorological observation by a government or
scientific organization, or a hot air balloon that is recovered after launching.
5. As used in this section, "balloon" means a flexible, nonporous bag made from
materials such as rubber, latex, polychloroprene, or nylon fabric that can be inflated or
filled with gas or fluid, such as helium, hydrogen, nitrous oxide, oxygen, air, or water,
and then sealed at the neck of the bag.
✔